Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20203-123
Division; cooperate with federal government; comply with federal laws.

The division is authorized to cooperate with the government of the United States, and any agency or department thereof, in the acquisition, construction, improvement, maintenance, and operation of airports and other air navigation facilities in this state and to comply with the provisions of the laws of the United States and any regulations made thereunder for the expenditure of federal money upon such airports and other navigation facilities.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 7(1), p. 87;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 21.